North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
§ 108A-54.
Authorization of Medical Assistance Program; administration.

The Department is authorized to establish a Medicaid Program in accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. The Department may adopt rules to implement the Program. The State is responsible for the nonfederal share of the costs of medical services provided under the Program. In addition, the State shall pay one hundred percent (100%) of the federal Medicare Part D clawback payments under the Medicare Modernization Act of 2004, P.L. 108-173, as amended. A county is responsible for the county’s cost of administering the Program in that county.

Recodified as

G.S. 108A-54.1

B(a) by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.9(a), effective July 1, 2013.

The Medicaid Program shall be administered and operated in accordance with this Part and the North Carolina Medicaid State Plan and Waivers, as periodically amended by the Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with

G.S. 108A-54.1

A and approved by the federal government.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall ensure that the North Carolina Families Accessing Services through Technology (NC FAST) information technology system can provide Medicaid eligibility determinations for the federally facilitated Health Benefit Exchange that will operate in North Carolina and shall provide such determinations for the Exchange.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall continue to administer and operate the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs through the Division of Medical Assistance until the Division of Medical Assistance is eliminated at which time all functions, powers, duties, obligations, and services vested in the Division of Medical Assistance are vested in the Division of Health Benefits. Prior to and following the exchange of powers and duties from the Division of Medical Assistance to the Division of Health Benefits, and in addition to the powers and duties already vested in the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services, the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall have the following powers and duties:

Administer and operate the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs, provided that the total expenditures, net of agency receipts, do not exceed the authorized budget for the Medicaid program and NC Health Choice program. None of the powers and duties enumerated in the other subdivisions of this subsection shall be construed to limit the broad grant of authority to administer and operate the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs.

Employ clerical and professional staff of the Division of Health Benefits, including consultants and legal counsel, necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the division. In hiring staff for the Division of Health Benefits, the Secretary may offer employment contracts for a term and set compensation for the employees, which may include performance-based bonuses based on meeting budget or other targets.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-64.20

, enter into contracts for the administration of the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs, as well as manage such contracts, including contracts of a consulting or advisory nature.

Establish and adjust all program components, except for eligibility categories, resource limits, and income thresholds, of the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs within the appropriated and allocated budget.

Adopt rules related to the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs.

Develop midyear budget correction plans and strategies and then take midyear budget corrective actions necessary to keep the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs within budget.

Approve or disapprove and oversee all expenditures to be charged to or allocated to the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs by other State departments or agencies.

Develop and present to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Office of State Budget and Management by January 1 of each year, beginning in 2017, the following information for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs:

A detailed four-year forecast of expected changes to enrollment growth and enrollment mix.

What program changes will be made by the Department in order to stay within the existing budget for the programs based on the next fiscal year’s forecasted enrollment growth and enrollment mix.

The cost to maintain the current level of services based on the next fiscal year’s forecasted enrollment growth and enrollment mix.

Publish on its Web site and update on at least a monthly basis, at a minimum, the following information about the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs:

Enrollment by program aid category by county.

Per member per month spending by category of service.

Spending and receipts by fund along with a detailed variance analysis.

A comparison of the above figures to the amounts forecasted and budgeted for the corresponding time period.

The General Assembly shall determine the eligibility categories, resource limits, and income thresholds for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs. The Department of Health and Human Services is expressly authorized to adopt temporary and permanent rules regarding eligibility requirements and determinations, to the extent that they do not conflict with the parameters set by the General Assembly.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-121, s. 2(h), effective June 1, 2016.

History.

1965, c. 1173, s. 1; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 24; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2007-323, s. 31.16.1(c); 2008-107, s. 10.10(c); 2011-399, s. 5; 2012-75, s. 1; 2013-5, s. 2; 2013-360, ss. 12H.3, 12H.9(a); 2013-363, s. 4.9(a); 2015-245, s. 13; 2016-94, s. 12H.4; 2016-121, s. 2(h); 2018-5, s. 11H.10(a), (b).

Cross References.

As to Medicaid and Health Choice provider requirements, see Chapter 108C,

G.S. 108C-1

et seq.

As to billing Medicaid for the cost of public health program services by local health departments, district health departments, and consolidated human services agencies, see

G.S. 130A-34.2

.

As to Medicaid appeals, see Part 6A (G.S. 108A-70.9A et seq.).

As to actions by the Secretary to ensure effective management of behavioral health services under the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver, see

G.S. 122C-124.2

.

Medical Coverage Policy Under State Medicaid Program.

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 21.20(a) provides: “(a) In order to promote consistency among providers and to ensure that medical coverage criteria are uniformly applied to Medicaid recipients throughout the State, the Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt medical coverage policies for the State Medicaid Program that are consistent with national standards or Department-defined standards. If the Department determines that application of a national standard would likely cause significant deterioration in the quality of or access to appropriate medical care, then the Department shall substitute for that national standard an evidence-based, best-practice standard that will not compromise quality of or access to appropriate medical care. The adoption of new or amended medical coverage policies under the State Medicaid Program are exempt from the rule-making requirements of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.”

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 21.20(b) sets out criteria for the development, amendment and adoption of medical coverage policy.

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 12C.3(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), shall establish an evidence-based pilot program to increase access to public benefits for seniors aged 65 and older who are dually enrolled in Medicare and Medicaid to (i) improve the health and independence of seniors and (ii) reduce health care costs. On or before January 1, 2017, the Division shall partner with a not-for-profit firm for the purposes of engaging in a data-driven campaign to help seniors aged 65 and older who are dually enrolled in Medicare and Medicaid meet their basic social needs. The not-for-profit firm shall have demonstrated experience in assisting with these types of services and the partnership shall accomplish each of the following:

“(1) Identify through data sharing, dual eligible seniors aged 65 and older who qualify for the Supplemental Nutrition and Assistance Program (SNAP) but are not currently enrolled.

“(2) Conduct an outreach program towards those seniors for the purpose of enrolling them into SNAP.

“(3) Provide comprehensive application assistance through outreach specialists to complete public benefits application processes.

“(4) Evaluate project effectiveness and explore how data can be utilized to achieve optimal outcomes.

“(5) Make recommendations regarding policy options available to the State to streamline access to benefits.

“(b) The Division of Social Services shall report to the Office of the Governor and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on its progress in the pilot program by February 1 following each year the pilot program is in place. The report shall, at a minimum, include the following:

“(1) The number of seniors age 65 and older who are dual eligibles but are not enrolled in SNAP.

“(2) The number of those identified that would be included in the sample population.

“(3) Methods of outreach toward those seniors in the sample population.

“(4) Number of to date enrollments in SNAP as a direct result of outreach during the pilot program.

“(5) Participation rate to date in SNAP of those seniors in the sample population.

“(6) Any other findings the Division deems relevant.

“(c) If funding and capacity exist, the Division of Social Services may expand the pilot program to include other public benefits programs.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11C.8(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), shall continue implementing an evidence-based pilot program to increase access to public benefits for seniors aged 65 and older who are dually enrolled in Medicare and Medicaid to (i) improve the health and independence of seniors and (ii) reduce health care costs. The Division shall continue to partner with a not-for-profit firm for the purposes of engaging in a data-driven campaign to help seniors aged 65 and older who are dually enrolled in Medicare and Medicaid meet their basic social needs. The not-for-profit firm shall have demonstrated experience in assisting with these types of services and the partnership shall accomplish each of the following:

“(1) Identify, through data sharing, dual eligible seniors aged 65 and older who qualify for the Supplemental Nutrition and Assistance Program (SNAP) but are not currently enrolled.

“(2) Conduct an outreach program toward those seniors for the purpose of enrolling them into SNAP.

“(3) Provide comprehensive application assistance through outreach specialists to complete public benefits application processes.

“(4) Evaluate project effectiveness and explore how data can be utilized to achieve optimal outcomes.

“(5) Make recommendations regarding policy options available to the State to streamline access to benefits.

“(b) The Division shall report to the Office of the Governor and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on its progress in the pilot program by February 1 following each year the pilot program is in place. The report shall, at a minimum, include the following:

“(1) The number of seniors age 65 and older who are dual eligibles but are not enrolled in SNAP.

“(2) The number of those identified that would be included in the sample population.

“(3) Methods of outreach toward those seniors in the sample population.

“(4) Number of to date enrollments in SNAP as a direct result of outreach during the pilot program.

“(5) Participation rate to date in SNAP of those seniors in the sample population.

“(6) Any other findings the Division deems relevant.

“(c) Any nonrecurring funds remaining in the 2016-2017 fiscal year from implementation of the pilot program under this section shall not revert, but shall remain available for continued implementation of the pilot program, along with any private or nonprofit funding provided to the Division for use in the pilot program. If funding and capacity exist, the Division of Social Services may expand the pilot program to include other public benefits programs.”

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 12E.1(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall create within the North Carolina AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) a health insurance premium assistance program that utilizes federal funds from Part B of the Ryan White HIV/AIDS Program and ADAP funds to provide eligible beneficiaries with premium and cost-sharing assistance for the purchase or maintenance of private health insurance coverage, including premiums, co-payments, and deductibles. In creating this program, the Department shall ensure full compliance with federal Health Resources and Services Administration (HRSA) guidance, including the methodology used to do all of the following:

“(1) Assess and compare the cost of providing prescription drugs to eligible beneficiaries through the health insurance premium assistance program created pursuant to this section versus the existing ADAP program.

“(2) Ensure that insurance premium assistance program funds are used solely to pay for premium and cost-sharing assistance for the purchase or maintenance of private health insurance coverage that provides, at a minimum, prescription coverage equivalent to the formulary available under Part B of the Ryan White HIV/AIDS Program.

“(3) Limit the total annual amount of funds expended for the health insurance premium assistance program authorized by this section to no more than the total annual cost of maintaining the same individuals on the existing ADAP Program.

“(b) By March 1, 2017, the Department shall submit a report to the House Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the operation of the program authorized by subsection (a) of this section, including any obstacles to implementation.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11E.8(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall continue to implement within the North Carolina AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) a health insurance premium assistance program that (i) is cost neutral or achieves savings; (ii) utilizes federal funds from Part B of the Ryan White HIV/AIDS Program and ADAP funds to provide individual ADAP participants or subsets of ADAP participants with premium and cost-sharing assistance for the purchase or maintenance of private health insurance coverage, including premiums, co-payments, and deductibles; and (iii) meets the requirements of Section 12E.1 of S.L. 2016-94.

“(b) By March 1, 2018, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on implementation of the health insurance premium assistance program authorized by subsection (a) of this section. The report must include at least all of the following components:

“(1) A detailed explanation of the program design.

“(2) A demonstration of cost neutrality, which shall include a comparison of the cost of providing prescription drugs to eligible beneficiaries through the health insurance premium program created pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and the cost of providing prescription drugs to eligible beneficiaries through the existing ADAP program.

“(3) Information on health outcomes of program participants.

“(4) Any obstacles to program implementation.”

Session Laws
2000-67, s. 11.6(a), provides: “Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services for the 1999-2000 fiscal year, the Department shall transfer to the Mental Health Restricted Reserve not more than the amount of actual expenditures for Medicaid payments for the 1998-99 fiscal year for services provided by area mental health authorities. The Department shall transfer from the Division of Medical Assistance the estimated amount needed to match Medicaid payments for the former Carolina Alternatives Programs. The Department shall not transfer from area program allocations funds to cover Medicaid payment expenditures that exceed the amount of funds in the Reserve for the 1999-2000 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2000-67, s. 11.6(c), provides: “Effective July 1, 2000, the county share of the cost of Medicaid Personal Care Services paid to adult care homes shall be decreased incrementally each fiscal year until the county share reaches fifteen percent (15%) of the nonfederal share by State fiscal year 2009-2010.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 10.11 provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish and implement two or more pilot programs to test new approaches to management of access to and utilization of health care services to Medicaid recipients. The purpose of the pilot programs is to determine if additional cost savings can be achieved in addition to that provided by the Community Care of North Carolina program. With respect to at least two of the pilot programs, the Department shall contract with a physician-owned and managed network that has demonstrated success in improving the cost-effectiveness of Medicaid services in at least one state other than North Carolina. The Department shall develop a payment methodology that may include sharing savings with contractors providing medical management services but the methodology shall not allow increased spending relative to current appropriations. The Department may apply for federal waivers necessary to implement this section. The Department shall report on the implementation of the pilot programs to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division not later than February 1, 2005.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 10.12(a) - (d) provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall develop a pilot program to implement the Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE). One pilot site shall be planned for the southeastern area of the State and the other pilot site shall be planned for the western area of the State. The Division shall design the pilot program to access federal Medicaid and Medicare dollars to provide acute and long-term care services for older patients through the use of interdisciplinary teams. When implemented, services provided through the PACE pilot program may include physician visits, drugs, rehabilitation services, personal care services, hospitalization, and nursing home care. The PACE pilot program may also offer social services intervention, case management, respite care, or extended home care nursing.

“(b) Of the funds appropriated to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, for the 2004-2005 fiscal year, the sum of one hundred twenty-three thousand one hundred fifty-six dollars ($123,156) shall be used to support two positions in the Division of Medical Assistance to develop the pilot programs in accordance with subsection (a) of this section. These funds may also be used to contract for actuarial analysis as part of the development of the pilot programs.

“(c)
The Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services on March 1, 2005, on PACE pilot program development. The report shall include services proposed to be offered under the pilot program, administrative structure of the pilot program, number of Medicare and Medicaid eligible recipients anticipated to receive services from the PACE pilot sites, and the projected savings to the State from PACE pilot program implementation.

“(d) Nothing in this section obligates the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the PACE program statewide.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12H.34(a), (b), provides: “(a) By October 1, 2014, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services with the following information on the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE):

“(1) The number of individuals being served in each of the PACE service areas.

“(2) A description of the program enrollment criteria and enrollment process.

“(3) Detailed figures showing how funding for the program has been spent during the past two fiscal years.

“(4) The per member per month cost of serving individuals through the PACE program compared to the cost of serving individuals in a nursing home.

“(5) An estimate of how many PACE participants would enter a nursing home if they were not enrolled with the PACE program.

“(b) By January 1, 2015, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall submit an additional report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services with the following information on the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE):

“(1) An update on all of the information required by subsection (a) of this section.

“(2) A comparison of North Carolina’s PACE program to PACE programs in other states.

“(3) Recommendations for how to make the program sustainable.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11H.25(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance (Department), shall conduct a study of the efficacy of the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE). In conducting the study, the Department shall engage a variety of stakeholders, including existing PACE organizations, PACE consumers, and the general public. The study shall consist of the following:

“(1) An evaluation of the existing program to include information on and an assessment of the following:

“a. An update on all of the information required to be reported on under Section 12H.34(b) of S.L. 2014-100.

“b. The structures of the various PACE organizations.

“c. Any clinical outcome or quality measures available for each PACE service or PACE organization.

“(2) A statewide assessment of anticipated long-term care needs over the next 10 years, broken down by county.

“(3) A review of PACE experiences in other states, including an analysis of costs and quality.

“(4) An evaluation of State regulations placed upon PACE providers. The study shall include the identification of any regulations that could be eliminated in order to reduce cost or unnecessary duplication.

“(5) An assessment of the role of PACE in the continuum of care, including opportunities to apply the PACE model to additional populations under the PACE Innovations Act of 2015, P.L. 114-85.

“(b) No later than March 1, 2018, the Department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice a report containing the information outlined in subsection (a) of this section, as well as any recommendations and proposed legislative changes that further the goal of providing the highest quality programs at a low cost to keep aging individuals in their homes.”

Session Laws
2007-323, s. 10.46, provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall continue its efforts to expand the scope of Community Care of NC care management model to recipients of Medicaid and dually eligible individuals with a chronic condition and long-term care needs. In expanding the scope, the Department shall focus on the Aged, Blind, and Disabled, and CAP-DA populations for improvement in management, cost-effectiveness, and local coordination of services through Community Care of NC and in collaboration with local providers of care. The Department shall target personal care services, private duty nursing, home health, durable medical equipment, ancillary professional services, specialty care, residential services, including skilled nursing facilities, home infusion therapy, pharmacy, and other services determined target-worthy by the Department. The Department shall pilot communitywide initiatives and shall expand statewide successful models. The initiatives may include one or more pilot projects to control costs and improve quality of care for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled recipients of Medicaid.

“(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall report not later than March 1, 2008, on the status of the implementation and findings of this pilot project with regard to improving the quality of care and controlling the cost of care for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled recipients of Medicaid. The report shall also address the Department’s plans for expanding the pilot project and implementing the practices for all Aged, Blind, and Disabled Medicaid recipients in the State. The Department shall submit the report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division.”

For a prior provision similar to

G.S. 108A-54

, see S.L.
2005-276, s. 10.17(a)-(e).

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 10.10, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services shall, pursuant to authority under section 1917(b) of the Social Security Act ( 42 USC § 1396p(c)), as amended by Public Law 109-171 effective January 1, 2007, develop a North Carolina Long-Term Care Partnership Program. The purpose of the Program is to reduce future Medicaid costs for long-term care by delaying or eliminating dependence on Medicaid. The Department shall structure and administer the Program in accordance with applicable federal law and guidelines for qualified State long-term care partnerships. The Program, including the treatment of assets for Medicaid eligibility and estate recovery, notwithstanding statutory provisions on treatment of assets and estate recovery to the contrary, shall offer incentives to individuals to ensure against the substantial costs of providing for their long-term care needs. The Department shall submit the proposed Program to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representative Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division prior to submitting the Program for federal approval of the necessary State Plan amendment. The Program shall not become effective until reviewed in accordance with this section.

Session Laws
2007-323, s. 10.40F, provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall evaluate and establish a pilot program in at least two but not more than four regions of the State to offer nursing facility certifiable (NFC) dual eligible Medicaid recipients services through a Special Needs Plan (SNP). The SNP will work with the Department’s Community Care Networks. The SNP must be currently licensed in the State, have expertise in managing NFC dually eligible Medicaid recipients, have expertise or a relationship with experts in geriatrics and be capable and willing to work directly with Community Care North Carolina (CCNC). The SNP must also have no citations or ongoing investigations from the State, the Centers for Medicaid and Medicare Services, or other regulatory agency.

“(b) In establishing the pilot program, the Department shall select up to four regions (county clusters) based on the number of NFC dual eligible Medicaid recipients, number of skilled nursing facilities, and other factors. These regions and their respective CCNC will work with the SNP to promote enhanced care, greater efficiency, and cost savings.

“(c) The Department shall report on the evaluation, selection, and implementation of the pilot program to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division not later than May 1, 2008. The Department shall include in its report information on increased primary care visits, hospital admission and readmission rates, mortality rates, results of pharmacy management, measurable quality outcomes, and associated cost savings for NFC managed through this pilot. The Department shall also include in its report the feasibility of expansion of the pilot to other regions of the State or expansion into the assisted living and home-based populations.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 10.9(b)-(j), provides: “(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall implement a smart card pilot program that involves enrollment, distribution, and use of smart cards by designated vendors and recipients as replacements for currently used Medicaid assistance cards. The Provider and Recipient Services Unit of the Division of Medical Assistance (DMA) shall administer the pilot program. The Department may contract with a third-party vendor or vendors to develop and execute the pilot program. If the Department elects to use a third-party vendor or vendors to develop and execute the pilot program, the Department shall select the vendor or vendors through a Request for Proposal process conducted prior to implementation of the pilot program. In developing and implementing the pilot program, the Department shall comply with all applicable information technology procurement requirements. The smart card pilot program shall not expand beyond the areas described in subsection (c) of this section unless the expansion is approved by an act of the General Assembly.

“(c) The purpose of the pilot program is to evaluate the feasibility of the smart card program in different geographical regions of the State. DMA shall select a region of the State to participate in the pilot program that is served by Community Care of North Carolina and meets all other requirements set forth in this section. The pilot program shall be conducted in two urban areas and two rural areas with a representative group of Medicaid recipients from each area.

“(d) The pilot program shall include and evaluate the use of at least two different types of available technology that are designed to do all of the following:

“(1) Authenticate recipients at the onset and completion of each point of transaction in order to prevent card sharing and other forms of fraud.

“(2) Deny ineligible persons at the point of transaction.

“(3) Authenticate providers at the point of transaction to prevent phantom billing and other forms of provider fraud.

“(4) Secure and protect the personal identity and information of recipients.

“(5) Reduce the total amount of medical assistance expenditures by reducing the average cost per recipient.

“(e) The pilot program may include all of the following:

“(1) A secure Web-based information system for recording and reporting authenticated transactions.

“(2) A secure Web-based information system that interfaces with the appropriate State databases to determine eligibility of recipients.

“(3) A system that gathers analytical information to be provided to business intelligence companies in order to assist in business intelligence processes.

“(4) A smart card with the ability to store multiple recipients’ information on one card.

“(5) An image of the recipient stored on both the smart card and database.

“(f) The pilot program shall not include a requirement for preenrollment of recipients.

“(g) In conducting the pilot program, the Department may do any of the following:

“(1) Incorporate additional or alternative methods of authentication of recipients.

“(2) Enter and store billing codes, deductible amounts, and bill confirmations.

“(3) Allow electronic prescribing services and prescription database integration and tracking in order to prevent medical error through information sharing and to reduce pharmaceutical abuse and lower health care costs.

“(4) Implement quick-pay incentives for providers who use electronic prescribing services, electronic health records, electronic patient records, or computerized patient records that automatically synchronize with recipients’ smart cards and electronically submit a claim.

“(5) Adapt smart cards, fingerprint scanners, and card readers for use by other State programs administered by the Department in order to reduce costs associated with the necessity of multiple cards per recipient.

“(h) During the pilot program, the Department shall evaluate the feasibility of expanding the pilot program, including the need to develop rules and policies related to all of the following:

“(1) Lost, forgotten, or stolen cards.

“(2) Enrollment of all recipients, regardless of age, for participation in the program.

“(3) Distribution and activation of smart cards for designated recipients.

“(i) The Department shall work with the Division of Motor Vehicles to ensure that State data, such as drivers license photos and other identification data, is leveraged to reduce program cost.

“(j) By no later than March 1, 2013, the Department shall submit a detailed written report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Senate Committee on Health and Human Services, the House Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include (i) detailed results of the pilot in the four different geographic regions of the State, including cost savings achieved in each region; (ii) costs associated with implementation of the pilot program, including payments to vendors; and (iii) an evaluation of the feasibility of, and issues associated with, implementing the smart card program statewide.”

Similar provisions contained in Session Laws
2011-117, ss. 1-6, were repealed by Session Laws
2012-142, s. 10.9(a).

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 10.36(f)-(k), as added by Session Laws
2010-31, s. 10.15, provide: “(f) The Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall conduct a Request for Proposal process to solicit bids from qualified outside entities with proven experience in conducting actuarial and health care studies and evaluations to annually report on the Medicaid cost savings achieved by the Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) networks during a 12-month period. Beginning March 1, 2011, and every year thereafter, the Department shall submit a report on the Medicaid cost savings achieved by the CCNC networks, which shall include children, adults, and the aged, blind, and disabled, to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division.

“(g) By October 1, 2010, the Department and the Division of Medical Assistance (DMA) shall contract with North Carolina Community Care Networks, Inc., (NCCCN, Inc.) and the 14 participating local CCNC networks represented by NCCCN, Inc., to provide standardized clinical and budgetary coordination, oversight, and reporting for a statewide Enhanced Primary Care Case Management System for Medicaid enrollees. The contract with NCCCN, Inc., shall build upon and expand the existing successful CCNC primary care case management model to include comprehensive statewide quantitative performance goals and deliverables which shall include all of the following areas: (i) service utilization management, (ii) budget analytics, (iii) budget forecasting methodologies, (iv) quality of care analytics, (v) participant access measures, and (vi) predictable cost containment methodologies.

“(h) NCCCN, Inc., shall report quarterly to the Department and to the Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM) on the development of the statewide Enhanced Primary Care Case Management System and its defined goals and deliverables as agreed upon in the contract. Beginning July 1, 2010, NCCCN, Inc., shall submit a quarterly report to the Secretary of Health and Human Services, OSBM, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the progress and results of implementing the quantitative, analytical, utilization, quality, cost containment, and access goals and deliverables set out in the contract. NCCCN, Inc., shall conduct its own analysis of the CCNC system to identify any variations from the development plan for the Enhanced Primary Care Case Management System and its defined goals and deliverables set out in the contract between DMA and NCCCN, Inc. Upon identifying any variations, NCCCN, Inc., shall develop and implement a plan to address the variations. NCCCN, Inc., shall report the plan to DMA within 30 days after taking any action to implement the plan.

“(i) By January 1, 2012, the Department and OSBM shall assess the performance of NCCCN, Inc., and CCNC regarding the goals and deliverables established in the contract. Based on this assessment, the Department and DMA shall expand, cancel, or alter the contract with NCCCN, Inc., and CCNC effective April 1, 2012. Expansion or alteration of the contract may reflect refinements based on clearly identified goals and deliverables in the areas of quality of care, participant access, cost containment, and service delivery.

“(j) By July 1, 2012, the Department, DMA, and NCCCN, Inc., shall finalize a comprehensive plan that establishes management methodologies which include all of the following: (i) quality of care measures, (ii) utilization measures, (iii) recipient access measures, (iv) performance incentive models in which past experience indicates a benefit from financial incentives, (v) accountable budget models, (vi) shared savings budget models, and (vii) budget forecasting analytics as agreed upon by the Department, DMA, and NCCCN, Inc. In the development of these methodologies, the Department, DMA, and NCCCN, Inc., shall consider options for shared risk. The Department and DMA shall provide assistance to NCCCN, Inc., in meeting the objectives of this section.

“(k) Beginning with the 2010-2011 fiscal year, the Department shall establish a separate line item in Budget Code 14445 for all expenditures in DMA associated with managed care activities pertaining to the utilization of Medicaid expenditures through CCNC.”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 10.41(b) and (d)-(f) provides: “(b) The Department shall make full development of the replacement MMIS a top priority. During the development and implementation of MMIS, the Department shall develop plans to ensure the timely and effective implementation of enhancements to the system to provide the following capabilities:

“(1) Receiving and tracking premiums or other payments required by law.

“(2) Compatibility with the administration of the Health Information System.
